src/particle-smj-lex.txt
! Divvun & Giellatekno - open source grammars for Sámi and other languages
! Copyright © 2000-2010 The University of Tromsø & the Norwegian Sámi Parliament
! http://giellatekno.uit.no & http://divvun.no
!
! This program is free software; you can redistribute and/or modify
! this file under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by
! the Free Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or
! (at your option) any later version. The GNU General Public License
! is found at http://www.gnu.org/licenses/gpl.html. It is
! also available in the file $GTHOME/LICENSE.txt.
!
! Other licensing options are available upon request, please contact
! giellatekno@hum.uit.no or divvun@samediggi.no

! Particles
! =========

LEXICON PCLE
+Pcle: # ;

LEXICON QPCLE
! +Qst+Pcle:%> # ; !Only Qst?
+Pcle: # ; ! only +Pcle, for sme harmonisation XXX

LEXICON Particle
aj PCLE ;
dal PCLE ;
!dat PCLE ; !XXX Really particle?
!de PCLE ; Moved to Adv and CC
gal PCLE ;
gul PCLE ;
galla PCLE ;
gus QPCLE ;
gu QPCLE ;
!gåla PCLE ; !Adv
ham PCLE ;
addjáj PCLE ;
juo PCLE ;
lik PCLE ;
nav PCLE ;
ga PCLE ;
så PCLE ;
máj PCLE ;
ban PCLE ;
rat PCLE ;
riek PCLE ;
vuojn PCLE ;
villap PCLE ;
villep PCLE ;
gis PCLE ;
má PCLE ;
na PCLE ; 
ná PCLE ;
då PCLE ;
iehtja PCLE ;
